North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-10.6 Corn Industry Promotion [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-10.6-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-02.
North Dakota corn utilization council — Members — Election — Term. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-03.
Corn districts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-04.
Meetings — Compensation and expenses of council. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-05.
Expenditure of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-06.
Council authority. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-07.
Certification of designated handlers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-08.
Assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-09.
Collection of assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-10.
Records by designated handlers — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-11.
Nonparticipating growers — Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-12.
Advisory referendum by voting growers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-13.
Collection of unpaid assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-14.
Penalty for nonpayment of assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-15.
Records of council — Inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.6-16.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.